District of Columbia statutes.
1-635.01

Separability.

Should any provision of this chapter be declared unconstitutional, invalid or beyond the statutory authority of the Council of the District, the remaining provisions of this chapter shall be unaffected by such a declaration.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3501, 25 DCR 5740

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-636.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-365.1.